Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2420
Section; how construed.

Nothing in section 54-2419 shall be construed to change the zoning authority of a county that existed prior to May 25, 1999.

Laws 1999, LB 822, § 10;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 54-2404.01;

Laws 2004, LB 916, § 9.

Because this section indicates that the Legislature did not intend to occupy the entire field of livestock waste management regulation and that the state requirements in the Livestock Waste Management Act were meant to coexist with local requirements, there is no field preemption of local laws by the Livestock Waste Management Act. Butler County Dairy v. Butler County, 285 Neb. 408, 827 N.W.2d 267 (2013).